Utah statutes.
16-10a-1703.   Publication.
(1)  The division shall annually publish copies of this chapter, together with
applicable annotations and commentary, for sale and distribution to the
public.
(2)  The division may charge a reasonable amount for copies of the chapter
sold or distributed.
(3)  The proceeds from all sales and distributions shall be deposited into the
Commerce Service Account created by Section 13-1-2, and may be appropriated to
the division for use in defraying past or future production, publication,
republication, or distribution costs.
